Louisiana, session 2026, SB461.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:808(A)(12) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§808. Eligibility in group programs
A. For the purposes of participating in life, health, or other programs
sponsored by the Office of Group Benefits, an employee is defined as:
* * *
(12) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary,
active employees of entities created by rule or order of the Supreme Court of
Louisiana as part of its regulatory function over the practice of law, including
the Louisiana Attorney Disciplinary Board and the Committee on Bar
Admissions, provided the court approves the entity's participation and the
entity pays the employer share of premiums due solely from monies generated
by the entity.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.